Aspell-Hunspell/MIA_US-Myaamia.aff
9# Aspell affix file for Myaamia (Mia) language
# Miami-Illinois Affix Rules
# MIA_US-Myaamia.aff
SET UTF-8
# category native american languages 
# ISO 639-3	mia
# Glottolog	miam1252
# ELP	Miami-Illinois
# Built from scratch for MySpell/Hunspell. Released under MIT.

# sources 
#   1) https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Miami%E2%80%93Illinois_language;
# https://mc.miamioh.edu/ilda-myaamia/dictionary 
# other Myaamia souced tribal docs , trying to learn more... 
# hand built TMX / json POT/GNU-Gettext  https://localise.biz/
# waiting on libree hosting https://hosted.weblate.org/projects/Myaamia/ 

# Revitalization Efforts , misc information 
# Miami–Illinois (endonym: myaamia,[a] [mjɑːmia]),[4] also known as Irenwa or Irenwe, 
# is an indigenous Algonquian language spoken in the United States, primarily in Illinois, Missouri, 
# Indiana, western Ohio and adjacent areas along the Mississippi River by the Miami and 
#Wea as well as the tribes of the Illinois Confederation, including the Kaskaskia, Peoria, 
#Tamaroa, and possibly Mitchigamea. The Myaamia (Miami) Nation of Oklahoma and the 
#Miami Nation of Indians of the State of Indiana (a nonprofit organization) still practice
#and use their native heritage to teach young and old so they can keep their traditional language alive.
#Miami–Illinois is an Algonquian language within the larger Algic family. 
#It is usually described as a Central Algonquian language, but that grouping denotes a geographic rather than genetic affiliation. 
#A thorough genetic classification of Central Algonquian languages has not yet been achieved, and so Miami–Illinois' closest relatives 
#have not been conclusively established. Lexically, Miami–Illinois most closely resembles the Sauk–Fox–Kickapoo language; 
#its phonology and morphology, however, are more reminiscent of Ojibwe–Potawatomi–Ottawa.


TRY eaiomnrkwpšʼlhcyžxčtňs'áéíóúąę

WORDCHARS '

# Miami-Illinois Affix Rules

# Consonants
PFX c0 Y 1
PFX c0 p .
# (rest of consonant rules omitted for brevity)

# Vowels
PFX v0 Y 1
PFX v0 i .
# (rest of vowel rules omitted for brevity)

# Suprasegmental Processes
PFX s0 Y 1
PFX s0 STRONG .
PFX s1 Y 1 
PFX s1 WEAK .
PFX d0 Y 1
PFX d0 DEVOICED .

# Plurals
SFX PL Y 3
SFX PL 0 aki [bcdfghjklmnpqrstvwxyz] # Consonant-ending
SFX PL 0 iki [aeiou] # Short vowel-ending
SFX PL 0 wa [aeiou:] # Long vowel-ending

# Plural Formation Rules
# Rule 1: Add -aki to nouns ending in a consonant
PFX r1 Y 1
PFX r1 c[0-12] . 
SFX r1 Y 1
SFX r1 aki .

# Rule 2: Add -iki to nouns ending in a short vowel
PFX r2 Y 1
PFX r2 v[0-3] . 
SFX r2 Y 1
SFX r2 iki .

# Rule 3: Add -wa to nouns ending in a long vowel
PFX r3 Y 1
PFX r3 v[4-7] .
SFX r3 Y 1
SFX r3 wa .


# Consonants
PFX c0 Y 1
PFX c0 p .
PFX c1 Y 1 
PFX c1 t .
PFX c2 Y 1
PFX c2 tʃ .
PFX c3 Y 1
PFX c3 k .
PFX c4 Y 1
PFX c4 ʔ .
PFX c5 Y 1
PFX c5 s .
PFX c6 Y 1
PFX c6 ʃ .
PFX c7 Y 1
PFX c7 m .
PFX c8 Y 1
PFX c8 n .
PFX c9 Y 1
PFX c9 w .
PFX c10 Y 1
PFX c10 l .
PFX c11 Y 1
PFX c11 j .
PFX c12 Y 1
PFX c12 h .

# Vowels
PFX v0 Y 1
PFX v0 i .
PFX v1 Y 1
PFX v1 e .
PFX v2 Y 1 
PFX v2 a .
PFX v3 Y 1
PFX v3 o .
PFX v4 Y 1
PFX v4 iː .
PFX v5 Y 1
PFX v5 eː .
PFX v6 Y 1
PFX v6 aː .
PFX v7 Y 1
PFX v7 oː .

# Suprasegmental Processes
# Strong/Weak Syllables
PFX s0 Y 1
PFX s0 STRONG . 
PFX s1 Y 1
PFX s1 WEAK .

# Vowel Devoicing
PFX d0 Y 1
PFX d0 DEVOICED .


REP 5
REP š sh
REP ž zh
REP č ch
REP ň ny
REP ʼ '

PFX A Y 2
PFX A 0 ki [^e]
PFX A 0 ki- e

PFX I Y 2
PFX I 0 naa [^e] 
PFX I 0 naa- e

SFX V Y 2
SFX V 0 hka [aio]
SFX V e hka e

CHECKCOMPOUND 2
COMPOUNDMIN 2
COMPOUNDRULE 2
COMPOUNDRULE #*0{
COMPOUNDRULE #*@}

# Number prefixes
PFX NUM Y 20
PFX NUM 0 nkoti . # One
PFX NUM 0 niišwi . # Two
# ... (other numbers)
PFX NUM 0 mataathswaahkwe . # Thousand

# Compounded numbers
COMPOUNDMIN 1
COMPOUNDRULE 2
COMPOUNDRULE #*1[0-9]
COMPOUNDRULE #*[2-9][0-9]*
#
# Base numbers (1-10) as stems (unchanged)
STEM nkoti # One
STEM niišwi # Two
# ... other base numbers

# Tens unit
STEM mataathswi # Ten

# Tens suffix rule (modify as needed)
SFX_TENS <- BASE + "aasi"

# Twenties (placeholder, needs further logic)
# ... define rule(s) for twenties (e.g., "niišwi mateeni" + ones digit)

# Fifties
STEM yaalanwi # Fifty 

# Hundreds
STEM nkotwaahkwe # One Hundred
STEM niišwaahkwe # Two Hundred
STEM mataathswaahkwe # One Thousand

# Example applications (update as needed)
nkoti + SFX_TENS -> nkotimeneehki (Nine)
mataathswi + SFX_TENS -> mataathswi -aasi (Eleven)

# Apply tens unit (placeholder)
# ... define logic to insert "mataathswi" before SFX_TENS for numbers above ten

# Apply fifties, hundreds, and thousands (placeholder)
# ... define rules to handle these numbers (likely as separate stems)


# ... other affix rules

SFX_AFFIRM <- BASE + "ki"  # Suffix for affirmative responses following "iihia"
# ... other affix rules

PFX_NEG <- moohci  # Negation prefix

... # Rules for verb stems and aspectual suffixes
# ... other affix rules

PFX_FUTILE_NEG <- maakooci  # Negation prefix expressing futility

# Animate Nouns
PFX a0 Y 1
PFX a0 akima .
PFX a1 Y 1
PFX a1 eeteeshia .
PFX a2 Y 1
PFX a2 nahaankana .
PFX a3 Y 1
PFX a3 mikihkwa .
PFX a4 Y 2
PFX a4 naala . 
PFX a5 Y 1
PFX a5 alenia .
PFX a6 Y 1
PFX a6 manetoowa .
PFX a7 Y 1
PFX a7 lenipinsia .

# Inanimate Nouns
PFX i0 Y 2
PFX i0 acihwki . 
PFX i1 Y 1
PFX i1 nipi .
PFX i2 Y 1
PFX i2 išiteehioni .
PFX i3 Y 2
PFX i3 waali .
PFX i4 Y 1
PFX i4 kaloosioni .
PFX i5 Y 1
PFX i5 waapimootayi .
PFX i6 Y 1
PFX i6 wiikiaami .
PFX i7 Y 2
PFX i7 waawi .

# Unexpectedly Animate Nouns
PFX u0 Y 1
PFX u0 ahkihkwa . # drum
PFX u1 Y 1 
PFX u1 ahsapa . # star
PFX u2 Y 1
PFX u2 alaankwia . # rainbow
PFX u3 Y 1
PFX u3 manetwa . # falling snow
PFX u4 Y 1
PFX u4 moohswaya . # deer hide
PFX u5 Y 1
PFX u5 piiwia . # feather
PFX u6 Y 1
PFX u6 aankwahsakwa . # driftwood

Prefixes for Ones:

PFX o1 Y 1
PFX o1 nkoti .
PFX o2 Y 1
PFX o2 niišwi .
(Repeat for the rest of the ones digits)
Prefixes for Tens:

PFX t2 Y 1
PFX t2 niišwi mateeni .
PFX t3 Y 1
PFX t3 nihswi mateeni .
(Repeat for the rest of the tens digits)
Prefixes for Hundreds:

PFX h1 Y 1
PFX h1 nkotwaahkwe .
PFX h2 Y 1
PFX h2 niišwaahkwe .
(Repeat for the rest of the hundreds digits)
Prefixes for Thousands:

PFX th1 Y 1
PFX th1 mataathswaahkwe .
PFX th10 Y 1
PFX th10 mataathswi mateeni .
PFX th100 Y 1
PFX th100 mataathswi waahkwe .
PFX th1000 Y 1
PFX th1000 mataathswi waahkwe mateeni .

ossessive Affix Ruleset for Miami-Illinois

# Possessives
PFX POSS Y 6
PFX POSS 0 ni- . # My
PFX POSS 0 ki- . # Your
PFX POSS 0 wi- . # His/Her
PFX POSS 0 nwa- . # Our
PFX POSS 0 kwa- . # Your (pl.)
PFX POSS 0 wi- . # Their

SFX POSSSUF Y 2
SFX POSSSUF 0 m . # Singular possessive
SFX POSSSUF 0 awi . # Plural possessive


ni-nkoti-m (My one)
ki-niišwi mateeni-awi (Your (pl.) twenty)
wi-nkotwaahkwe-m (His/Her hundred)


#Pronoun Affix Ruleset for Miami-Illinois

# Independent Personal Pronouns:

# Pronouns
PFX PRON Y 17
PFX PRON 0 niila . # I, me
PFX PRON 0 kiila . # You
# ... (other pronouns)
PFX PRON 0 aweena . # Who
PFX PRON 0 keetwi . # What
PFX PRON 0 aweeya . # Somebody
PFX PRON 0 moohci_aweeya . # Nobody
"Alone" Pronouns:

PFX ap1 Y 1
PFX ap1 niilaahka . (Alone, by myself)
PFX ap2 Y 1
PFX ap2 kiilaahka . (Alone, by yourself)
PFX ap3 Y 1
PFX ap3 awiilaahka . (Alone, by himself/herself/itself)
PFX ap4 Y 1
PFX ap4 niiloonaahka . (Alone, by ourselves, exclusive)
PFX ap5 Y 1
PFX ap5 kiiyoowe . (Alone, by yourselves, plural)
PFX ap6 Y 1
PFX ap6 awiiyoowe . (Alone, by themselves)
Reflexive Pronouns:

PFX rp1 Y 1
PFX rp1 niiyawi . (Myself)
PFX rp2 Y 1
PFX rp2 kiiyawi . (Yourself)
PFX rp3 Y 1
PFX rp3 awiiyawi . (Himself/Herself/Itself)
PFX rp4 Y 1
PFX rp4 niiyoonaani . (Ourselves, exclusive)
PFX rp5 Y 1
PFX rp5 kiiyoonaani . (Ourselves, inclusive)
PFX rp6 Y 1
PFX rp6 kiiyoowe . (Yourselves, plural)
Other Pronouns:

PFX op1 Y 1
PFX op1 aweena . (Who)
PFX op2 Y 1
PFX op2 keetwi . (What)
PFX op3 Y 1
PFX op3 aweeya . (Somebody)
PFX op4 Y 1
PFX op4 moohci aweeya . (Nobody)

# Define Number Flags
# N = Ones, T = Tens, H = Hundreds
COMPOUNDRULE 3
COMPOUNDRULE (H)(T)(N)
COMPOUNDRULE (H)(N)
COMPOUNDRULE (T)(N)

# Example Entries in MIA_US-Myaamia.dic:
# nkotwaahkwe/H
# niišwi_mateeni/T
# yaalanwi/N
# Suffix for numbers 11-19 (the "added" marker)
SFX N1 Y 1
SFX N1 0 aasi .

# In your .dic file:
# mataathswi/N1  # This allows "mataathswi" to combine with the ones
SET UTF-8
TITLE Myaamia (Miami-Illinois) Affix Rules
# ISO 639-3: mia | Built for Myaamia Nation Revitalization
WORDCHARS 'ʼ-

# Replacement rules for orthographic variations
REP 6
REP š sh
REP ž zh
REP č ch
REP ň ny
REP ʼ '
REP sh š

# --- PLURALIZATION (Nouns) ---
# Nouns are categorized by Animacy and Ending
SFX PL Y 3
SFX PL 0 aki [^aeiou]   # Consonant-ending: Animate (e.g., lenia -> leniaki)
SFX PL 0 iki [aeiou]    # Short vowel-ending
SFX PL 0 wa [aeiou]     # Long vowel/special endings

# --- POSSESSIVE PREFIXES ---
# These attach to the beginning of noun roots
PFX P Y 6
PFX P 0 ni- .           # 1st Person (My)
PFX P 0 ki- .           # 2nd Person (Your)
PFX P 0 wi- .           # 3rd Person (His/Her)
PFX P 0 nwa- .          # 1st Plural (Our)
PFX P 0 kwa- .          # 2nd Plural (Your pl.)
PFX P 0 wi- .           # 3rd Plural (Their)

# --- NUMBER SYSTEM (The "11-19" Logic) ---
# Flag 'N1' handles the "added" marker for teen numbers
SFX N1 Y 1
SFX N1 0 aasi .          # mataathswi + aasi = mataathswiaasi (11-ish context)

# --- NEGATION & ASPECT ---
PFX NEG Y 2
PFX NEG 0 moohci- .     # Standard Negation
PFX NEG 0 maakooci- .   # Futile Negation

# --- COMPOUNDING RULES ---
# Allows combining Hundreds (H), Tens (T), and Ones (O)
COMPOUNDMIN 2
COMPOUNDRULE 3
COMPOUNDRULE (H)(T)(O)
COMPOUNDRULE (H)(O)
COMPOUNDRULE (T)(O)
